Utah statutes.
19-6-415.5.   State-owned underground tanks to participate in program.

Any underground storage tank owned or leased by the state of Utah and subject to the financial assurance requirements established by division rule shall participate in the program.



Enacted by Chapter 172, 1997 General Session

